Maine, session 132, LD332.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §253-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. B, §14, is
amended to read:
2. Any term of years Gross sexual assault against individual not yet 12 years of
age; mandatory sentence alternative. If the State pleads and proves that a crime under
section 253 was committed against an individual who had not yet attained 12 years of age,
the court, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, shall impose a definite term
of imprisonment for any term of not less than 25 years, none of which may be suspended.
In determining the basic term of imprisonment as the first step in the sentencing process
specified in section 1602, subsection 1, paragraph A, the court shall select a definite term
of at least 20 not less than 25 years, none of which may be suspended. The court shall also
impose as part of the sentence a period of supervised release to immediately follow that
definite term of imprisonment as mandated by section 1881, subsection 1.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §253-A, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Gross sexual assault against individual not yet 12 years of age; repeat
offenders; mandatory sentence alternative. If the State pleads and proves that a crime
under section 253 was committed against an individual who had not yet attained 12 years
of age and that the defendant had previously been convicted and sentenced for committing
gross sexual assault, formerly denominated as gross sexual misconduct, or rape against an
individual who had not yet attained 12 years of age or that the defendant had previously
been convicted and sentenced for engaging in substantially similar conduct in another
jurisdiction against an individual who had not yet attained 12 years of age, the court,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, shall impose a term of imprisonment
for life.
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1604, sub-§2, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2,
is amended to read:
B. If the State pleads and proves that the defendant is a repeat sexual assault offender,
the court may set a definite term of imprisonment under section 253‑A, subsection 1
for any term of years; and
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §1604, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2,
is amended to read:
C. In the case of the Class A crime of gross sexual assault against an individual who
had not yet attained 12 years of age, the court shall set a definite term of imprisonment
under section 253‑A, subsection 2 for any term of not less than 25 years., none of which
may be suspended; and
Sec. 5. 17-A MRSA §1604, sub-§2, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. In the case of the Class A crime of aggravated sex trafficking for which the State
pleads and proves that the defendant knowingly promoted prostitution of a person who
had not yet attained 12 years of age, the court shall set a definite term of imprisonment
of not less than 25 years, none of which may be suspended.
Page 1 - 132LR1861(01)